Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.230

Unlawful sale of subscription television services.

(1) A person is guilty of unlawful sale of subscription television services if, with intent to avoid payment or to facilitate the avoidance of payment of the lawful charge for any subscription television service, he or she, without authorization from the subscription television service company:

(a) Publishes or advertises for sale a plan for a device that is designed in whole or in part to receive subscription television or services offered for sale by the subscription television service company, regardless of whether the programming or services are encoded, filtered, scrambled, or otherwise made unintelligible;

(b) Advertises for sale or lease a device or kit for a device designed in whole or in part to receive subscription television services offered for sale by the subscription television service company, regardless of whether the programming or services are encoded, filtered, scrambled, or otherwise made unintelligible; or

(c) Manufactures, imports into the state of Washington, distributes, sells, leases, or offers for sale or lease a device, plan, or kit for a device designed in whole or in part to receive subscription television services offered for sale by the subscription television service company, regardless of whether the programming or services are encoded, filtered, scrambled, or otherwise made unintelligible.

(2) Unlawful sale of subscription television services is a class C felony.

[ 1995 c 92 s 3; 1985 c 430 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1985 c 430: See note following RCW 9A.56.220.